Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1814YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 411 Section 1. Section 237A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 16. âUnhousedâ means lacking a fixed, 3 regular, and adequate nighttime residence. âUnhousedâ includes 4 but is not limited to all of the following: 5 a. A person living in the housing of other persons due to 6 the personâs loss of housing, economic hardship, or similar 7 reason. 8 b. A person living in a motel, hotel, or campground due to 9 the lack of a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. 10 c. A person living in an emergency or transitional shelter. 11 d. A person abandoned in a hospital. 12 e. A person living in a place not designed for, or 13 ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human 14 beings. 15 f. A person living in a car, park, public space, abandoned 16 building, substandard housing, bus or train station, or similar 17 setting. 18 Sec. 2. Section 237A.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A family the department has determined 21 is unhoused shall not be required to make a copayment or 22 similar payment to the state as a condition of participation in 23 the state child care assistance program. The exemption created 24 by this subsection shall continue for a family until six months 25 from the date the department has determined the family is no 26 longer unhoused. 27